Texas, session 892, HB94.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 421, Government Code, is amended by adding Subchapter G to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER G.  TEXAS DIVISION OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT HILL COUNTRY 2025 FLOOD RESPONSE GRANT PROGRAM Sec. 421.121.  DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter: (1)  "Division" means Texas Division of Emergency Management. (2)  "Chief" means the Chief of the Texas Division of Emergency Management. (3)  "Local government" means a municipality, county, special district or authority, or any other political subdivision of this state. Sec. 421.122.  TEXAS DIVISION OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT HILL COUNTRY 2025 FLOOD RESPONSE GRANT PROGRAM. (a) The Texas Division of Emergency Management Hill Country Flood Response Grant Program is established to: (1)  administer a grant program to assist local governments with acquiring emergency communication equipment that is interoperable with other emergency communication equipment and infrastructure in this state and with constructing additional emergency communication infrastructure to ensure that the first responders of this state have access to equipment and infrastructure that is interoperable to the extent necessary to effectively communicate during an emergency. Sec. 421.123.  GRANT PROGRAM.  (a)  The Division shall establish a grant program to provide grants to local governments for the purchase of emergency communication equipment and infrastructure, the construction of emergency communication infrastructure, and the expenses of training employees of the local government for the effective use of the equipment during an emergency. (b)  To be eligible for a grant under the grant program, an applicant must be a local government, submit a proposal to the Division, and comply with the rules established by the Division for the administration of the grant program. (c)  The Chief shall establish procedures to administer the grant program, including: (1)  eligibility criteria for a grant recipient; (2)  guidelines relating to grant amounts; and (3)  procedures for submitting and evaluating proposals. (d)  The Division shall enter into a contract that includes performance requirements with each grant recipient.  The Division shall monitor and enforce the terms of the contract. (e)  The Division may require as a condition of a grant awarded under this section that: (1)  the officers or employees of the recipient successfully complete one or more training programs, as determined by the Division, which may include incident command system training; and (2)  the recipient adopt standardized procedures for incident command or management. Sec. 421.124.  USES OF GRANT MONEY. Money awarded under the grant program may be used only to: (1)  purchase emergency communication equipment, including radios, spare parts, and accessories, for use by first responders that is interoperable with the other emergency communication equipment and infrastructure in this state or enables interoperability; (2)  construct emergency communication infrastructure, including radio towers, that is interoperable with the other emergency communication equipment and infrastructure in this state or enables interoperability, including the acquisition of land necessary for the construction; (3)  cover the cost of adapting existing emergency communication equipment or infrastructure to, or otherwise integrating the equipment or infrastructure with, new emergency communication equipment purchased or infrastructure constructed; (4)  cover the operational or maintenance cost of the equipment or infrastructure described by Subdivision (1), (2), or (3); or (5)  attend or provide the training to first responders on the effective use of the equipment and infrastructure described by Subdivisions (1), (2), and (3). Sec. 421.125.  GRANT PROGRAM FUNDING. The Division may use any available funds to implement the grant program. Sec. 421.126.  GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS.  The Division may accept gifts, grants, and donations from any source, including private and nonprofit organizations, for the purpose of implementing this subchapter. Sec. 421.127.  RULES.  The Division may adopt rules to administer this subchapter. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect September 1, 2025.